Texas statutes.
CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

TITLE 1. CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

CHAPTER 3. DEFINITIONS

Art. 3.01. WORDS AND PHRASES. All words, phrases and terms used in this Code are to be taken and understood in their usual acceptation in common language, except where specially defined.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 909, ch. 341, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1975.

Art. 3.02. CRIMINAL ACTION. A criminal action is prosecuted in the name of the State of Texas against the accused, and is conducted by some person acting under the authority of the State, in accordance with its laws.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Art. 3.03. OFFICERS. The general term "officers" includes both magistrates and peace officers.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Art. 3.04. OFFICIAL MISCONDUCT. In this code:

(1) "Official misconduct" means an offense that is an intentional or knowing violation of a law committed by a public servant while acting in an official capacity as a public servant.

(2) "Public servant" has the meaning assigned by Section 1.07, Penal Code.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 3.05. RACIAL PROFILING. In this code, "racial profiling" means a law enforcement-initiated action based on an individual's race, ethnicity, or national origin rather than on the individual's behavior or on information identifying the individual as having engaged in criminal activity.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 947, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(5), eff. January 1, 2025.